Idaho, session 2025, H0410.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-130, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-130. CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECKS FOR SCHOOL DISTRICT EMPLOYEES, OR AP-
PLICANTS FOR CERTIFICATES, OR INDIVIDUALS HAVING CONTACT WITH STUDENTS, AND
SCHOOL CHAPLAINS -- STATEWIDE LIST OF SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS. (1) The depart-
ment of education, through the cooperation of the Idaho state police, shall
establish a system to obtain a criminal history check on individuals to in-
clude, but is, including but not limited to, certificated and noncertifi-
cated employees, all applicants for certificates pursuant to chapter 12, ti-
tle 33, Idaho Code, substitute staff, individuals involved in other types
of student training such as practicums and internships, and on all individu-
als who have unsupervised contact with students in a K-12 setting, or school
chaplains pursuant to section 33-1212B, Idaho Code. The criminal history
check shall be based on a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint card or scan
and shall include, at a minimum, the following state and national databases:
(a) Idaho bureau of criminal identification;
(b) Federal bureau of investigation (FBI) criminal history check; and
(c) Statewide sex offender register registry.
(2) The state department of education shall charge all such individu-
als a fee necessary to cover the cost of undergoing a criminal history check
pursuant to this section. The total fee shall be sufficient to cover the net
costs charged by the federal bureau of investigation and the state police. A
record of all background checks shall be maintained at the state department
of education in a data bank for all employees of a school district with a copy
going to the employing school district, when requested at the time of the ap-
plication or within six (6) months following the performance of the criminal
history check. A copy shall also be provided to the applicant upon request.
(3) The state department of education shall maintain a statewide list
of substitute teachers. The term "substitute teacher" shall have the mean-
ing as provided in section 33-512(15), Idaho Code.
(4) The Idaho state police and the department of education shall im-
plement a joint exercise of powers agreement pursuant to sections 67-2328


through 67-2333, Idaho Code, necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 12, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1212B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1212B. SCHOOL CHAPLAINS. (1) Any school district or public charter
school may adopt a policy authorizing employing or accepting as a volunteer a
school chaplain to provide support, services, and programs for enrolled stu-
dents, staff employed by the school, and parents of enrolled students. Any
school district or public charter school that chooses to employ or accept as
a volunteer a school chaplain under this section shall determine the selec-
tion criteria for the school chaplain in school policy. The school district
or public charter school shall decide which support, services, or programs
that the school chaplains may offer.
(2) School districts and public charter schools adopting a policy pur-
suant to this section may employ or accept as a volunteer more than one (1)
school chaplain. A school chaplain employed by or volunteering at a public
school under this section is not required to be certificated or credentialed
by the state department of education. School chaplains under this section
shall meet the requirements of section 33-130, Idaho Code, regarding crimi-
nal history checks.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.